test/src/morphology/N-hardie_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - hardie: # Noun 'shoulder / hartia' - full paradigm
     hardie+N+Sg+Nom: hardie
     hardie+N+Sg+Gen: hardien
     hardie+N+Sg+Acc: [hardie, hardien]
     hardie+N+Sg+Par: hardiedu
     hardie+N+Sg+Tra: hardiekse
     hardie+N+Sg+Abe: [hardietta, hardieta, hardiettah]
     hardie+N+Sg+Com: hardienke
     hardie+N+Sg+Ine: hardies
     hardie+N+Sg+Ela: [hardiespäi, hardies]
     hardie+N+Sg+Ill: hardieh
     hardie+N+Sg+Ade: hardiel
     hardie+N+Sg+Abl: [hardielpäi, hardiel]
     hardie+N+Sg+All: hardiele
     hardie+N+Sg+Ess: hardiennu
     hardie+N+Sg+Ter: hardiessah
     hardie+N+Sg+Apr: hardielluo
     hardie+N+Pl+Nom: hardiet
     hardie+N+Pl+Gen: hardieloin
     hardie+N+Pl+Acc: hardiet
     hardie+N+Pl+Par: hardieloi
     hardie+N+Pl+Tra: hardieloikse
     hardie+N+Pl+Abe: [hardieloitta, hardieloita, hardieloittah]
     hardie+N+Pl+Com: hardieloinke
     hardie+N+Pl+Ine: hardielois
     hardie+N+Pl+Ela: [hardieloispäi, hardielois]
     hardie+N+Pl+Ill: hardieloihe
     hardie+N+Pl+Ade: hardieloil
     hardie+N+Pl+Abl: [hardieloilpäi, hardieloil]
     hardie+N+Pl+All: hardieloile
     hardie+N+Pl+Ess: hardieloinnu
     hardie+N+Pl+Ins: hardieloin
     hardie+N+Pl+Apr: hardieloilluo
     hardie+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: hardiegi
     hardie+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: hardiengi
     hardie+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [hardiegi, hardiengi]
     hardie+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: hardiedugi
     hardie+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: hardieksegi
     hardie+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [hardiettagi, hardietagi, hardiettahgi]
     hardie+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: hardienkegi
     hardie+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: hardiesgi
     hardie+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [hardiespäigi, hardiesgi]
     hardie+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: hardiehgi
     hardie+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: hardielgi
     hardie+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [hardielpäigi, hardielgi]
     hardie+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: hardielegi
     hardie+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: hardiennugi
     hardie+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: hardiessahgi
     hardie+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: hardielluogi
     hardie+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: hardietgi
     hardie+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: hardieloingi
     hardie+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: hardietgi
     hardie+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: hardieloigi
     hardie+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: hardieloiksegi
     hardie+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [hardieloittagi, hardieloitagi, hardieloittahgi]
     hardie+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: hardieloinkegi
     hardie+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: hardieloisgi
     hardie+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [hardieloispäigi, hardieloisgi]
     hardie+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: hardieloihegi
     hardie+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: hardieloilgi
     hardie+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [hardieloilpäigi, hardieloilgi]
     hardie+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: hardieloilegi
     hardie+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: hardieloinnugi
     hardie+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: hardieloingi
     hardie+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: hardieloilluogi
